Ohio, session 136, SB200.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO:
Section 1. That section 122.1712 of the Revised Code be 4
enacted to read as follows: 5
Sec. 122.1712. (A) The Ohio Israel Trade and Innovation 6
Partnership is created. The partnership shall study potential 7
means of advancing the following: 8
(1) Bilateral trade and investment between Ohio and 9
Israel; 10
(2) Policy issues of mutual interest to Ohio and Israel; 11
(3) Business and academic exchanges between Ohio and 12
Israel; 13
(4) Mutual economic support between Ohio and Israel; 14
(5) Mutual investment in the infrastructure of Ohio and 15
Israel; 16
(6) Specific industries, emerging technology opportunities 17

S. B. No. 200 Page 2
As Introduced
and, innovation clusters that warrant support from Ohio and 18
Israel; 19
(7) Multilateral partnerships between Ohio, Israel, and 20
other nations regarding the industries, emerging technology 21
opportunities, or innovation clusters identified in division (A) 22
(6) of this section, such as partnerships between Israel and 23
nations in Africa, Asia, Europe, members of the Gulf cooperation 24
council, and Oceania; 25
(8) Other issues as determined by the partnership. 26
(B) The partnership shall consist of the following 27
members: 28
(1) Two members of the senate, appointed by the president 29
of the senate, who have knowledge of, or current or past 30
involvement in, organizations that promote Israeli affairs, or 31
have interest in the well-being of trade relations between Ohio 32
and Israel; 33
(2) One member of the senate, appointed by the minority 34
leader of the senate, who has knowledge of, or current or past 35
involvement in, organizations that promote Israeli affairs, or 36
has interest in the well-being of trade relations between Ohio 37
and Israel; 38
(3) Two members of the house of representatives, appointed 39
by the speaker of the house of representatives, who have 40
knowledge of, or current or past involvement in, organizations 41
that promote Israeli affairs, or have interest in the well-being 42
of trade relations between Ohio and Israel; 43
(4) One member of the house of representatives, appointed 44
by the minority leader of the house of representatives, who has 45
knowledge of, or current or past involvement in, organizations 46

S. B. No. 200 Page 3
As Introduced
that promote Israeli affairs, or has interest in the well-being 47
of trade relations between Ohio and Israel; 48
(5) Eight members appointed by the governor, with the 49
advice and consent of the senate, who shall include the 50
following: 51
(a) One member who represents a state institution of 52
higher education, as defined in section 3345.011 of the Revised 53
Code; 54
(b) One member who represents the Ohio chamber of commerce 55
or a successor organization that advances business interests in 56
this state; 57
(c) One member who represents the nonprofit corporation 58
Ohio Jewish communities; 59
(d) One member who represents the nonprofit corporation 60
formed under section 187.01 of the Revised Code; 61
(e) Two members who represent a regional affiliate of the 62
nonprofit corporation formed under section 187.01 of the Revised 63
Code; 64
(f) Two members, who represent Ohio's business community, 65
from any of the following organizations: 66
(i) An Ohio local chamber of commerce; 67
(ii) Ohio business roundtable; 68
(iii) Ohio manufacturers' association; 69
(iv) Ohio life sciences. 70
(6) Three ex-officio members as follows: 71
(a) The chancellor of higher education; 72

S. B. No. 200 Page 4
As Introduced
(b) The director of development; 73
(c) The lieutenant governor. 74
(C) Members of the partnership shall be appointed not 75
later than ninety days after the effective date of this section. 76
Members of the partnership appointed under divisions (B)(1) to 77
(4) of this section shall serve terms of two years or for the 78
remainder of the member's legislative term, whichever is less. 79
Members of the partnership appointed under division (B)(5) of 80
this section shall serve terms of four years. Any vacancy on the 81
partnership shall be filled in the same manner as the original 82
appointment. 83
(D) Members of the partnership shall serve without 84
compensation but may be reimbursed for expenses actually 85
incurred in the performance of their duties, within the limits 86
of funds available to the partnership for such purposes. 87
(E)(1) The partnership shall meet and hold hearings at the 88
places it designates throughout the state. 89
(2) The partnership shall elect a chairperson from among 90
the members of the partnership. The chairperson may appoint from 91
the partnership members of subcommittees and subcommittee 92
chairpersons at the chairperson's discretion. 93
(3) A majority of the members of the partnership 94
constitutes a quorum for the transaction of the business of the 95
partnership. 96
(F) Not later than fifteen months after the effective date 97
of this section, and annually thereafter, the partnership shall 98
issue a report of its activities during the preceding year, and 99
any associated findings and recommendations, to the governor, 100
the president of the senate, and the speaker of the house of 101

S. B. No. 200 Page 5
As Introduced
representatives. 102
Section 2. All items in this act are hereby appropriated 103
as designated out of any moneys in the state treasury to the 104
credit of the designated fund. For all operating appropriations 105
made in this act, those in the first column are for fiscal year 106
2026 and those in the second column are for fiscal year 2027. 107
The operating appropriations made in this act are in addition to 108
any other operating appropriations made for these fiscal years. 109
110
1 2 3 4 5
A DEV DEPARTMENT OF DEVELOPMENT
B General Revenue Fund
C GRF 1954A4 Ohio-Israel Trade and $5,000,000 $5,000,000
Innovation Partnership
D TOTAL GRF General Revenue Fund $5,000,000 $5,000,000
E TOTAL ALL BUDGET FUND GROUPS $5,000,000 $5,000,000
OHIO-ISRAEL TRADE AND INNOVATION PARTNERSHIP 111
The foregoing appropriation item 1954A4, Ohio-Israel Trade 112
and Innovation Partnership, shall be used to support the 113
activities of the Ohio-Israel Trade and Innovation Partnership 114
established under section 122.1712 of the Revised Code. 115
Section 3. Within the limits set forth in this act, the 116
Director of Budget and Management shall establish accounts 117
indicating the source and amount of funds for each appropriation 118
made in this act, and shall determine the manner in which 119
appropriation accounts shall be maintained. Expenditures from 120

S. B. No. 200 Page 6
As Introduced
operating appropriations contained in this act shall be 121
accounted for as though made in, and are subject to all 122
applicable provisions of, the main operating appropriations act 123
of the 136th General Assembly. 124